District of Columbia statutes.
38-2001.12

Discharge of teachers.

Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed to prevent the discharge of any teacher at any time in the discretion of the Board of Education of the District of Columbia under the provisions of law.

Jan. 15, 1920, 41 Stat. 389, ch. 39, § 12
June 11, 1926, 44 Stat. 730, ch. 556, § 1
1981 Ed., § 31-1213.
1973 Ed., § 31-713.